Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 69. Develop and administer a purple star school initiative that recognizes applicant schools in this state that have demonstrated a commitment to supporting military-connected students and the families of such students with the goal of increasing the amount of support that schools Senate File 275, p. 2 in this state make available to military-connected students and the families of such students. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 275, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor